District of Columbia statutes.
31-3232

Uniform consultation referral forms.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply to all health insurers that issue or deliver individual or group health benefit plans in the District of Columbia.

(b)

All health insurers that require the insured to have a written referral to receive consultation services shall use the uniform consultation referral form adopted by the Commissioner as the sole instrument for referrals for consultation services.

(c)

The uniform consultation referral form shall be properly completed by the health care provider that refers the insured for consultation services.

April 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-97, § 3, 49 DCR 994